Florida, session 2026, SB1332.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 169 170 Section 1.âSubsections (3) and (4) of section 322.141, 171 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 172 322.141âColor or markings of certain licenses or 173 identification cards.â 174 (3)âAll licenses for the operation of motor vehicles or 175 identification cards originally issued or reissued by the 176 department to persons who are designated as sexual predators 177 under s. 775.21 or subject to registration as sexual offenders 178 under s. 943.0435 or s. 944.607, or who have a similar 179 designation or are subject to a similar registration under the 180 laws of another jurisdiction, or who are designated as career 181 offenders under s. 775.261 or s. 944.608, shall have on the 182 front of the license or identification card the following: 183 (a)âFor a person designated as a sexual predator under s. 184 775.21 or who has a similar designation under the laws of 185 another jurisdiction, the marking âSEXUAL PREDATOR.â 186 (b)âFor a person subject to registration as a sexual 187 offender under s. 943.0435 or s. 944.607, or subject to a 188 similar registration under the laws of another jurisdiction, the 189 marking â943.0435, F.S.â 190 (c)âFor a person designated as a career offender under s. 191 775.261 or s. 944.608, the marking â775.261, F.S.â 192 (4)(a)âUnless previously secured or updated, each sexual 193 offender and sexual predator shall report to the department 194 during the month of his or her reregistration as required under 195 s. 775.21(8), s. 943.0435(14), or s. 944.607(13) in order to 196 obtain an updated or renewed driver license or identification 197 card as required by subsection (3). 198 (b)âUnless previously secured or updated as required by 199 subsection (3), each career offender shall report to the 200 department during the month of his or her birth in order to 201 obtain an updated or renewed driver license or identification 202 card as required by subsection (3). 203 Section 2.âSection 775.261, Florida Statutes, is amended to 204 read: 205 775.261âThe Florida Career Offender Registration Act.â 206 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as âThe Florida 207 Career Offender Registration Act.â 208 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 209 (a)ââCareer offenderâ means any person who is designated as 210 a habitual violent felony offender, a violent career criminal, 211 or a three-time violent felony offender under s. 775.084 or as a 212 prison releasee reoffender under s. 775.082(9). 213 (b)ââChief of policeâ means the chief law enforcement 214 officer of a municipality. 215 (c)ââCommunityâ means any county where the career offender 216 lives or otherwise establishes or maintains a permanent, 217 temporary, or transient permanent residence. 218 (d)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Law Enforcement. 219 (e)ââEntering the countyâ includes being discharged from a 220 correctional facility, jail, or secure treatment facility within 221 the county or being under supervision within the county with a 222 career-offender designation as specified in paragraph (a). 223 (f)ââPermanent residenceâ means a place where the career 224 offender abides, lodges, or resides for 3 14 or more consecutive 225 days that is the personâs home or other place where the person 226 primarily lives. For the purpose of calculating a permanent 227 residence under this paragraph, the first day that a career 228 offender abides, lodges, or resides at a place is excluded and 229 each subsequent day is counted. A day includes any part of a 230 calendar day. 231 (g)ââProfessional licenseâ means the document of 232 authorization or certification issued by an agency of this state 233 for a regulatory purpose, or by any similar agency in another 234 jurisdiction for a regulatory purpose, to a person to engage in 235 an occupation or to carry out a trade or business. 236 (h)1.(g)ââTemporary residenceâ means: 237 1.âa place where the career offender abides, lodges, or 238 resides, including, but not limited to, vacation, business, or 239 personal travel destinations in or out of this state, for 3 a 240 period of 14 or more days in the aggregate during any calendar 241 year that and which is not the personâs career offenderâs 242 permanent or transient residence. The term includes an in-state 243 travel residence. address; 244 2.âFor a career offender whose permanent residence is not 245 in this state, the term also includes a place where the career 246 offender is employed, practices a vocation, or is enrolled as a 247 student for any period of time in this state. For the purpose of 248 calculating a temporary residence under this paragraph, the 249 first day that a career offender abides, lodges, or resides at a 250 place is excluded and each subsequent day is counted. A day 251 includes any part of a calendar day.; or 252 2.âThe term includes an âin-state travel residence,â which 253 means a temporary residence in this state established by a 254 person who already has an existing permanent, temporary, or 255 transient residence in this state. 256 3.âA place where the career offender routinely abides, 257 lodges, or resides for a period of 4 or more consecutive or 258 nonconsecutive days in any month and which is not the career 259 offenderâs permanent residence, including any out-of-state 260 address. 261 (i)ââTransient residenceâ means a county where the career 262 offender lives, remains, or is located for the purpose of 263 abiding, lodging, or residing for a period of 3 or more days in 264 the aggregate during a calendar year that is not the personâs 265 permanent or temporary residence. The term includes, but is not 266 limited to, a place where the career offender sleeps or seeks 267 shelter and a location that has no specific street address. For 268 the purpose of calculating a transient residence under this 269 paragraph, the first day that a career offender lives, remains, 270 or is located in a county for the purpose of abiding, lodging, 271 or residing is excluded and each subsequent day is counted. A 272 day includes any part of a calendar day. 273 (j)ââVehicles ownedâ means any motor vehicle as defined in 274 s. 320.01 which is registered, coregistered, leased, titled, or 275 rented by a career offender; a rented vehicle that a career 276 offender is authorized to drive; or a vehicle for which a career 277 offender is insured as a driver. The term also includes any 278 motor vehicle as defined in s. 320.01 which is registered, 279 coregistered, leased, titled, or rented by a person or persons 280 residing at a career offenderâs permanent residence for 5 or 281 more consecutive days. 282 (3)âCRITERIA FOR REGISTRATION AS A CAREER OFFENDER.â 283 (a)âA career offender released on or after July 1, 2002, 284 from a sanction imposed in this state must register as required 285 under this section subsection (4) and is subject to community 286 and public notification as provided under subsection (11) (5). 287 If no sanction is imposed, the person is deemed to be released 288 upon conviction. For purposes of this section, a sanction 289 imposed in this state means includes, but is not limited to, a 290 fine, probation, community control, parole, conditional release, 291 control release, or incarceration in a state prison, federal 292 prison, contractor-operated correctional facility, or local 293 detention facility, and: 294 1.âThe career offender has not received a pardon for any 295 felony or other qualified offense that is necessary for the 296 operation of this paragraph; or 297 2.âA conviction of a felony or other qualified offense 298 necessary to the operation of this paragraph has not been set 299 aside in any postconviction proceeding. 300 (b)âThis section does not apply to any person who has been 301 designated as a sexual predator and who is required to register 302 under s. 775.21 or who is required to register as a sexual 303 offender under s. 943.0435 or s. 944.607. However, if a person 304 is no longer required to register as a sexual predator under s. 305 775.21 or as a sexual offender under s. 943.0435 or s. 944.607, 306 the person must register as a career offender under this section 307 if the person is otherwise designated as a career offender as 308 provided in this section. 309 (c)âA person subject to registration as a career offender 310 is not subject to registration as a convicted felon under s. 311 775.13. However, if the person is no longer required to register 312 as a career offender under this section, the person must 313 register under s. 775.13 if required to do so under that 314 section. 315 (d)âIf a career offender is not sentenced to a term of 316 imprisonment, the clerk of the court shall ensure that the 317 career offenderâs fingerprints are taken and forwarded to the 318 department within 48 hours after the court renders its finding 319 that an offender is a career offender. The fingerprints shall be 320 clearly marked, âCareer Offender Registration.â 321 (4)âINITIAL REGISTRATION.âUpon initial registration, a 322 career offender shall: 323 (a)âReport in person at A career offender must register 324 with the department by providing the following information to 325 the department, or to the sheriffâs office: 326 1.âIn the county in which the career offender establishes 327 or maintains a permanent, or temporary, or transient residence, 328 within 48 hours 2 working days after: 329 a.âEstablishing a permanent, or temporary, or transient 330 residence in this state; or 331 b.âWithin 2 working days after Being released from the 332 custody, control, or supervision of the Department of 333 Corrections or from the custody of a contractor-operated 334 correctional facility or local detention facility; or: 335 2.âIn the county where he or she was convicted within 48 336 hours after being convicted for a qualifying offense for 337 registration under this section if the offender is not in the 338 custody or control of, or under the supervision of, the 339 Department of Corrections, or is not in the custody of a 340 contractor-operated correctional facility or local detention 341 facility. 342 (b)1.âProvide his or her name;, social security number;, 343 age, race; sex;, gender, date of birth;, height;, weight;, hair 344 and eye color; tattoos or other identifying marks; fingerprints; 345 palm prints;, photograph;, employment information, including 346 occupation, business name, employment address, and telephone 347 number; address of permanent or legal residence and address of 348 any current temporary residence, within the state or out of 349 state, including a rural route address and or a post office box; 350 if he or she has no permanent or temporary address, any 351 transient residence within this state; address, location or 352 description, and dates of any current or known future temporary 353 residence within this state or out of state; the make, model, 354 color, vehicle identification number (VIN), and license tag 355 number of all vehicles owned; all home telephone numbers and 356 cellular telephone numbers;, date and place of any employment, 357 date and place of each conviction;, fingerprints, and a brief 358 description of the crime or crimes committed by the career 359 offender. A career offender may not provide a post office box 360 may not be provided in lieu of a physical residential address. 361 The career offender shall also produce his or her passport, if 362 he or she has a passport, and, if he or she is an alien, shall 363 produce or provide information about documents establishing his 364 or her immigration status. The career offender shall also 365 provide information about any professional licenses he or she 366 has. 367 2.âIf the career offenderâs place of residence is a motor 368 vehicle, trailer, mobile home, or manufactured home, as those 369 terms are defined in chapter 320, the career offender shall also 370 provide to the department through the sheriffâs office written 371 notice of the vehicle identification number (VIN); the license 372 tag number; the registration number; and a description, 373 including color scheme, of the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile 374 home, or manufactured home. If a career offenderâs place of 375 residence is a vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat, as 376 those terms are defined in chapter 327, the career offender 377 shall also provide to the department through the sheriffâs 378 office written notice of the hull identification number; the 379 manufacturerâs serial number; the name of the vessel, live 380 aboard vessel, or houseboat; the registration number of the 381 vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat; and a description, 382 including color scheme, of the vessel, live-aboard vessel, or 383 houseboat. 384 3.âAny change in any of the information required to be 385 provided pursuant to this paragraph, including, but not limited 386 to, any change in the career offenderâs permanent, temporary, or 387 transient residence; name; home telephone numbers and cellular 388 telephone numbers; employment information; and vehicles owned 389 after the career offender reports in person at the sheriffâs 390 office must be reported in the manner provided in subsections 391 (5)-(8). 392 (c)2.âProvide any other information determined necessary by 393 the department, including criminal and corrections records; 394 nonprivileged personnel and treatment records; and evidentiary 395 genetic markers, when available. When 396 (b)âIf a career offender registers with the sheriffâs 397 office, the sheriff shall take a photograph, and a set of 398 fingerprints, and palm prints of the career offender and forward 399 the photographs, and fingerprints, and palm prints to the 400 department, along with the information that the career offender 401 is required to provide pursuant to this section. The sheriff 402 shall promptly provide to the department the information 403 received from the career offender. 404 (d)(c)âWithin 48 hours 2 working days after the report 405 registration required under this subsection paragraph (a), a 406 career offender who is not incarcerated and who resides in the 407 community, including a career offender under the supervision of 408 the Department of Corrections pursuant to s. 944.608, shall 409 report register in person at a driver license office of the 410 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, unless a driver 411 license or identification card that complies with s. 322.141(3) 412 was previously secured or updated under s. 944.608 and shall 413 present proof of registration. At the driver license office, the 414 career offender shall: 415 1.âIf otherwise qualified, secure a Florida driver license, 416 renew a Florida driver license, or secure an identification 417 card. The career offender shall identify himself or herself as a 418 career offender who is required to comply with this section and 419 shall provide proof that the career offender reported as 420 required in this subsection. The career offender shall provide 421 any of the information specified in this subsection, if 422 requested. The career offender shall submit to the taking of a 423 photograph for use in issuing a driver license, renewed license, 424 or identification card, and for use by the department in 425 maintaining current records of career offenders, provide his or 426 her place of permanent or temporary residence, including a rural 427 route address or a post office box, and submit to the taking of 428 a photograph for use in issuing a driver license, renewed 429 license, or identification card, and for use by the department 430 in maintaining current records of career offenders. The career 431 offender may not provide a post office box in lieu of a physical 432 residential address. If the career offenderâs place of residence 433 is a motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, or manufactured home, 434 as defined in chapter 320, the career offender shall also 435 provide to the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 436 the vehicle identification number; the license tag number; the 437 motor vehicle registration number; and a description, including 438 color scheme, of the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, or 439 manufactured home. If a career offenderâs place of residence is 440 a vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat, as defined in 441 chapter 327, the career offender shall also provide to the 442 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles the hull 443 identification number; the manufacturerâs serial number; the 444 name of the vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat; the 445 registration number; and a description, including color scheme, 446 of the vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat. 447 2.âPay the costs assessed by the Department of Highway 448 Safety and Motor Vehicles for issuing or renewing a driver 449 license or identification card as required by this section. The 450 driver license or identification card issued must be in 451 compliance with s. 322.141(3). 452 3.âProvide, upon request, any additional information 453 necessary to confirm the identity of the career offender, 454 including a set of fingerprints. 455 (5)âMAINTAINING REGISTRATION.â 456 (a)(d)âEach time a career offenderâs driver license or 457 identification card is subject to renewal, and, without regard 458 to the status of the career offenderâs driver license or 459 identification card, within 48 hours 2 working days after any 460 change of the career offenderâs residence or change in the 461 career offenderâs name by reason of marriage or other legal 462 process, the career offender must report in person to a driver 463 license office, and shall be subject to the requirements 464 specified in paragraph (4)(d) (c). The Department of Highway 465 Safety and Motor Vehicles shall forward to the department and to 466 the Department of Corrections all photographs and information 467 provided by career offenders. Notwithstanding the restrictions 468 set forth in s. 322.142, the Department of Highway Safety and 469 Motor Vehicles may release a reproduction of a color-photograph 470 or digital-image license to the department for purposes of 471 public notification of career offenders as provided in this 472 section and ss. 775.26 and 944.609. A career offender who is 473 unable to secure or update a driver license or an identification 474 card with the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles as 475 provided in paragraph (4)(d) and this subsection shall report 476 any change in the career offenderâs name by reason of marriage 477 or other legal process within 48 hours after the change in 478 person to the sheriffâs office in the county where the career 479 offender resides or is located. The reporting requirements under 480 this paragraph do not negate the requirement for a career 481 offender to obtain a Florida driver license or an identification 482 card as required in this section. 483 (b)âA career offender shall report in person to the 484 sheriffâs office within 48 hours after any change in vehicles 485 owned to report those vehicle information changes. 486 (c)âA career offender shall register all changes to his or 487 her home telephone numbers and cellular telephone numbers, 488 including added and deleted numbers, and all changes to 489 employment information, including the creation of a new business 490 if self-employed, in person at the sheriffâs office, or in 491 person at the Department of Corrections if the career offender 492 is in the custody or control, or under the supervision, of the 493 Department of Corrections. All changes required to be reported 494 under this paragraph must be reported within 48 hours after the 495 change. 496 (d)âIf the career offender is in the custody of a local 497 jail, the custodian of the local jail shall notify the 498 department within 3 business days after intake of the career 499 offender for any reason and upon release. The custodian of the 500 local jail shall also take a digitized photograph of the career 501 offender while the career offender remains in custody and shall 502 provide the digitized photograph to the department. The 503 custodian shall notify the department if the career offender 504 escapes from custody or dies. 505 (6)âESTABLISHING A RESIDENCE WITHIN THIS STATE AFTER 506 INITIAL REGISTRATION.â 507 (a)âEach time a career offenderâs driver license or 508 identification card is subject to renewal, and, without regard 509 to the status of the career offenderâs driver license or 510 identification card, within 48 hours after any change in the 511 career offenderâs permanent, temporary, or transient residence, 512 the career offender must report in person to a driver license 513 office and shall be subject to the requirements specified in 514 paragraph (4)(d). The Department of Highway Safety and Motor 515 Vehicles shall forward to the department and to the Department 516 of Corrections all photographs and information provided by 517 career offenders. Notwithstanding the restrictions set forth in 518 s. 322.142, the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 519 may release a reproduction of a color-photograph or digital 520 image license to the department for purposes of public 521 notification of career offenders as provided in this section and 522 ss. 775.26 and 944.609. A career offender who is unable to 523 secure or update a driver license or an identification card with 524 the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles as provided 525 in paragraph (4)(d) and this subsection shall report any change 526 in the career offenderâs permanent, temporary, or transient 527 residence within 48 hours after the change in person to the 528 sheriffâs office in the county where the career offender resides 529 or is located. The reporting requirements under this paragraph 530 do not negate the requirement for a career offender to obtain a 531 Florida driver license or an identification card as required in 532 this section. This paragraph does not apply to an in-state 533 travel residence. 534 (b)âA career offender shall report an in-state travel 535 residence within 48 hours after establishing the residence. The 536 report shall be made in person at the sheriffâs office in the 537 county in which the career offender is located, or in person at 538 the Department of Corrections if the career offender is in the 539 custody or control, or under the supervision of, the Department 540 of Corrections. 541 (c)âA career offender who vacates a permanent, temporary, 542 or transient residence and fails to establish or maintain 543 another permanent, temporary, or transient residence shall, 544 within 48 hours after vacating the permanent, temporary, or 545 transient residence, report in person to the sheriffâs office of 546 the county in which he or she is located. The career offender 547 shall specify the date upon which he or she intends to or did 548 vacate such residence. The career offender must provide or 549 update all of the registration information required under 550 paragraph (4)(b). The career offender must provide an address 551 for the residence or other place where he or she is or will be 552 located during the time in which he or she fails to establish or 553 maintain a permanent, temporary, or transient residence. 554 (d)âA career offender who remains at a permanent, 555 temporary, or transient residence after reporting his or her 556 intent to vacate such residence shall, within 48 hours after the 557 date upon which the career offender indicated he or she would or 558 did vacate such residence, report in person to the agency to 559 which he or she reported pursuant to paragraph (c) for the 560 purpose of reporting his or her address at such residence. When 561 the sheriff receives the report, the sheriff shall promptly 562 provide the information to the department. An offender who makes 563 a report as required under paragraph (c) but fails to make a 564 report as required under this paragraph commits a felony of the 565 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 566 or s. 775.084. 567 (7)âESTABLISHING A NON-FLORIDA RESIDENCE.â 568 (e)âIf the career offender registers at an office of the 569 department, the department must notify the sheriff and, if 570 applicable, the police chief of the municipality, where the 571 career offender maintains a residence within 48 hours after the 572 career offender registers with the department. 573 (a)(f)âA career offender who intends to establish a 574 permanent, temporary, or transient residence in another state or 575 jurisdiction other than the State of Florida shall report in 576 person to the sheriff of the county of current residence at 577 least 48 hours or the department within 2 working days before 578 the date he or she intends to leave this state to establish 579 residence in another state or jurisdiction other than the State 580 of Florida. Any travel that is not known by the career offender 581 48 hours before he or she intends to establish a residence in 582 another state or jurisdiction must be reported in person to the 583 sheriffâs office as soon as possible before departure. If the 584 career offender is under the supervision of the Department of 585 Corrections, the career offender shall notify the supervising 586 probation officer of his or her intent to transfer supervision, 587 satisfy all transfer requirements pursuant to the Interstate 588 Compact for Supervision of Adult Offenders, as provided in s. 589 949.07, and abide by the decision of the receiving jurisdiction 590 to accept or deny transfer. The career offender must provide to 591 the sheriff or department the address, municipality, county, and 592 state or jurisdiction of intended residence. The sheriff shall 593 promptly provide to the department the information received from 594 the career offender. The failure of a career offender to provide 595 his or her intended place of residence is punishable as provided 596 in subsection (13) (8). 597 (b)(g)âA career offender who indicates his or her intent to 598 establish a permanent, temporary, or transient residence reside 599 in another a state or jurisdiction other than the State of 600 Florida and later decides to remain in this state shall, within 601 48 hours 2 working days after the date upon which the career 602 offender indicated he or she would leave this state, report in 603 person to the sheriffâs office sheriff or the department, 604 whichever agency is the agency to which the career offender 605 reported the intended change of permanent, temporary, or 606 transient residence and report, of his or her intent to remain 607 in this state. If the sheriff is notified by the career offender 608 that he or she intends to remain in this state, The sheriff 609 shall promptly report this information to the department. A 610 career offender who reports his or her intent to establish a 611 permanent, temporary, or transient residence reside in another a 612 state or jurisdiction other than the State of Florida, but who 613 remains in this state without reporting to the sheriff or the 614 department in the manner required by this paragraph, commits a 615 felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 616 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 617 (8)âANNUAL REREGISTRATION REQUIREMENT.â 618 (a)âA career offender must report in person each year 619 during the month of the career offenderâs birthday to the 620 sheriffâs office in the county in which he or she maintains a 621 permanent, temporary, or transient residence or is otherwise 622 located to reregister. 623 (b)âThe sheriffâs office may determine the appropriate 624 times and days for reporting by the career offender, which must 625 be consistent with the reporting requirements of this 626 subsection. Reregistration must include any changes to the 627 following information: 628 1.âName; social security number; race; sex; date of birth; 629 height; weight; hair and eye color; tattoos or other identifying 630 marks; fingerprints; palm prints; photograph; employment 631 information, including occupation, business name, employment 632 address, and telephone number; address of permanent residence 633 and address of any current temporary residence, within the state 634 or out of state, including a rural route address and a post 635 office box; if he or she has no permanent or temporary address, 636 any transient residence within this state; address, location or 637 description, and dates of any current or known future temporary 638 residence within the state or out of state; the make, model, 639 color, vehicle identification number (VIN), and license tag 640 number of all vehicles owned; and all home telephone numbers and 641 cellular telephone numbers. A post office box may not be 642 provided in lieu of a physical residential address. The career 643 offender shall also produce his or her passport, if he or she 644 has a passport, and, if he or she is an alien, shall produce or 645 provide information about documents establishing his or her 646 immigration status. The career offender shall also provide 647 information about any professional licenses he or she has. 648 2.âIf the career offenderâs place of residence is a motor 649 vehicle, trailer, mobile home, or manufactured home, as those 650 terms are defined in chapter 320, the career offender shall also 651 provide the vehicle identification number (VIN); the license tag 652 number; the registration number; and a description, including 653 color scheme, of the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, or 654 manufactured home. If the career offenderâs place of residence 655 is a vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat, as those terms 656 are defined in chapter 327, the career offender shall also 657 provide the hull identification number; the manufacturerâs 658 serial number; the name of the vessel, live-aboard vessel, or 659 houseboat; the registration number of the vessel, live-aboard 660 vessel, or houseboat; and a description, including color scheme, 661 of the vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat. 662 (c)âThe sheriffâs office shall electronically submit to and 663 update with the department, in a manner prescribed by the 664 department, all such information provided by the career offender 665 within 2 business days after the career offender provides it to 666 the sheriffâs office. 667 (9)âVERIFICATION.âCounty and local law enforcement 668 agencies, in conjunction with the department, shall verify the 669 addresses of career offenders who are not under the care, 670 custody, control, or supervision of the Department of 671 Corrections at least one time per calendar year, and may verify 672 the addresses of career offenders who are under the care, 673 custody, control, or supervision of the Department of 674 Corrections. Local law enforcement agencies shall report to the 675 department any failure by a career offender to comply with 676 registration requirements. 677 (h)1.âThe department shall maintain online computer access 678 to the current information regarding each registered career 679 offender. The department must maintain hotline access so that 680 state, local, and federal law enforcement agencies may obtain 681 instantaneous locator file and criminal characteristics 682 information on release and registration of career offenders for 683 purposes of monitoring, tracking, and prosecution. The 684 photograph and fingerprints need not be stored in a computerized 685 format. 686 2.âThe departmentâs career offender registration list, 687 containing the information described in subparagraph (a)1., is a 688 public record. The department may disseminate this public 689 information by any means deemed appropriate, including operating 690 a toll-free telephone number for this purpose. When the 691 department provides information regarding a career offender to 692 the public, department personnel must advise the person making 693 the inquiry that positive identification of a person believed to 694 be a career offender cannot be established unless a fingerprint 695 comparison is made, and that it is illegal to use public 696 information regarding a career offender to facilitate the 697 commission of a crime. 698 3.âThe department shall adopt guidelines as necessary 699 regarding the registration of a career offender and the 700 dissemination of information regarding a career offender as 701 required by this section. 702 (10)(i)âRELIEF FROM REGISTRATION.âA career offender must 703 maintain registration with the department for the duration of 704 his or her life, unless the career offender has received a full 705 pardon or has had a conviction set aside in a postconviction 706 proceeding for any offense or offenses that meet meets the 707 criteria for classifying the person as a career offender for 708 purposes of registration. However, a registered career offender 709 shall be considered for removal of the requirement to register 710 as a career offender only if he or she who has been lawfully 711 released from confinement, supervision, or sanction, whichever 712 is later, for at least 20 years and has not been arrested for 713 any felony or misdemeanor offense since release. 714 (a)âIf the career offender meets the criteria in this 715 subsection, the career offender may, for the purpose of removing 716 the requirement for registration as a career offender, petition 717 the criminal division of the circuit court of the circuit in 718 which the registered career offender designation initially 719 occurred resides for the purpose of removing the requirement for 720 registration as a career offender. 721 (b)âThe court may grant or deny such relief if the 722 registered career offender demonstrates to the court that he or 723 she has not been arrested for any crime since release and the 724 court is otherwise satisfied that the registered career offender 725 is not a current or potential threat to public safety. The 726 department and the state attorney in the circuit in which the 727 petition is filed must be given notice of the petition at least 728 3 weeks before the hearing on the matter. The department and the 729 state attorney may present evidence in opposition to the 730 requested relief or may otherwise demonstrate the reasons why 731 the petition should be denied. If the court denies the petition, 732 the court may set a future date at which the registered career 733 offender may again petition the court for relief, subject to the 734 standards for relief provided in this subsection paragraph. 735 (c)âThe department shall remove a person from 736 classification as a career offender for purposes of registration 737 if the person provides to the department a certified copy of the 738 courtâs written findings or order that indicates that the person 739 is no longer required to comply with the requirements for 740 registration as a career offender. 741 (11)(5)âCOMMUNITY AND PUBLIC NOTIFICATION.â 742 (a)âLaw enforcement agencies may inform the community and 743 the public of the presence of a career offender in the 744 community. Upon notification of the presence of a career 745 offender, the sheriff of the county or the chief of police of 746 the municipality where the career offender establishes or 747 maintains a permanent, or temporary, or transient residence may 748 notify the community and the public of the presence of the 749 career offender in a manner deemed appropriate by the sheriff or 750 the chief of police. 751 (b)âThe sheriff or the police chief may coordinate the 752 community and public notification efforts with the department. 753 Statewide notification to the public is authorized, as deemed 754 appropriate by local law enforcement personnel and the 755 department. 756 (c)1.âThe department is responsible for the online 757 maintenance of the current information regarding each career 758 offender. The department must maintain hotline access for state, 759 local, and federal law enforcement agencies to obtain 760 instantaneous locator file and criminal characteristics 761 information on release and registration of career offenders for 762 the purposes of monitoring, tracking, and prosecution. The 763 photograph and fingerprints need not be stored in a computerized 764 format. 765 2.âThe departmentâs career offender registration list is a 766 public record. The department may disseminate this public 767 information by any means deemed appropriate, including operating 768 a toll-free telephone number for this purpose. When the 769 department provides information regarding a career offender to 770 the public, department personnel must advise the person making 771 the inquiry that positive identification of a person believed to 772 be a career offender cannot be established unless a fingerprint 773 comparison is made, and that it is illegal to use public 774 information regarding a career offender to facilitate the 775 commission of a crime. 776 3.âThe department shall adopt guidelines as necessary 777 regarding the registration of a career offender and the 778 dissemination of information regarding a career offender as 779 required by this section. However, the department may not 780 display on or disseminate through the Internet public registry 781 maintained by the department any information regarding a vehicle 782 that is owned by a person who is not required to register as a 783 career offender. 784 (6)âVERIFICATION.âThe department and the Department of 785 Corrections shall implement a system for verifying the addresses 786 of career offenders. The sheriff of each county shall annually 787 verify the addresses of career offenders who are not under the 788 care, custody, control, or supervision of the Department of 789 Corrections. The sheriff shall promptly provide the address 790 verification information to the department in an electronic 791 format. The address verification information must include the 792 verifying personâs name, agency, and phone number, the date of 793 verification, and the method of verification, and must specify 794 whether the address information was verified as correct, 795 incorrect, or unconfirmed. 796 (12)(7)âIMMUNITY.âThe department, the Department of Highway 797 Safety and Motor Vehicles, the Department of Corrections, any 798 law enforcement agency in this state, and the personnel of those 799 departments; an elected or appointed official, public employee, 800 or school administrator; or an employee, agency, or any 801 individual or entity acting at the request or upon the direction 802 of any law enforcement agency is immune from civil liability for 803 damages for good faith compliance with the requirements of this 804 section or for the release of information under this section and 805 shall be presumed to have acted in good faith in compiling, 806 recording, reporting, or releasing the information. The 807 presumption of good faith is not overcome if a technical or 808 clerical error is made by the department, the Department of 809 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, the Department of 810 Corrections, the personnel of those departments, or any 811 individual or entity acting at the request or upon the direction 812 of any of those departments in compiling or providing 813 information, or if information is incomplete or incorrect 814 because a career offender fails to report or falsely reports his 815 or her current place of permanent, or temporary, or transient 816 residence. 817 (13)(8)âPENALTIES.â 818 (a)âExcept as otherwise specifically provided, a career 819 offender who fails to register; who fails, after registration, 820 to maintain, acquire, or renew a driver license or an 821 identification card; who fails to provide required location 822 information or change-of-name information; who fails to provide 823 all home telephone numbers and cellular telephone numbers; who 824 fails to report any changes to employment information, including 825 the addition of new employment, termination of existing 826 employment, and changes to the occupation, business name, 827 employment address, and telephone number of previously reported 828 employment; who fails to report any changes to vehicles owned, 829 including the addition of new vehicles and changes to the make, 830 model, color, vehicle identification number (VIN), and license 831 tag numbers of previously reported vehicles; who fails to make a 832 required report in connection with vacating a permanent 833 residence; who fails to reregister as required; who fails to 834 respond to any address verification correspondence from the 835 department or from county or local law enforcement agencies 836 within 3 weeks after the date of the correspondence; who 837 knowingly provides false registration information by act or 838 omission; or who otherwise fails, by act or omission, to comply 839 with the requirements of this section, commits a felony of the 840 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 841 or s. 775.084. Each instance of failure to register or report 842 changes to the required information specified in this paragraph 843 constitutes a separate offense. 844 (b)âA career offender who commits any act or omission in 845 violation of this section, s. 944.608, or s. 944.609 may be 846 prosecuted for the act or omission in the county in which the 847 act or omission was committed, in the county of the last 848 registered address of the career offender, in the county in 849 which the conviction occurred for the offense or offenses that 850 meet the criteria for designating a person as a career offender, 851 in the county in which he or she was designated a career 852 offender, in the county where the career offender was released 853 from incarceration, or in the county of the intended address of 854 the career offender as reported by the offender before his or 855 her release from incarceration. 856 (c)âAn arrest on charges of failure to register when the 857 career offender has been provided and advised of his or her 858 statutory obligations to register under this section, the 859 service of an information or a complaint for a violation of this 860 section, or an arraignment on charges for a violation of this 861 section constitutes actual notice of the duty to register. A 862 career offenderâs failure to register immediately as required by 863 this section following such arrest, service, or arraignment 864 constitutes grounds for a subsequent charge of failure to 865 register. A career offender charged with the crime of failure to 866 register who asserts, or intends to assert, a lack of notice of 867 the duty to register as a defense to a charge of failure to 868 register shall immediately register as required by this section. 869 A career offender who is charged with a subsequent failure to 870 register may not assert the defense of a lack of notice of the 871 duty to register. Registration following such arrest, service, 872 or arraignment is not a defense and does not relieve the career 873 offender of criminal liability for the failure to register. 874 (d)(b)âAny person who misuses public records information 875 concerning a career offender, as defined in this section, or a 876 career offender, as defined in s. 944.608 or s. 944.609, to 877 secure a payment from such career offender; who knowingly 878 distributes or publishes false information concerning such a 879 career offender which the person misrepresents as being public 880 records information; or who materially alters public records 881 information with the intent to misrepresent the information, 882 including documents, summaries of public records information 883 provided by law enforcement agencies, or public records 884 information displayed by law enforcement agencies on websites or 885 provided through other means of communication, commits a 886 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 887 775.082 or s. 775.083. 888 (9)âPROSECUTIONS FOR ACTS OR OMISSIONS.âA career offender 889 who commits any act or omission in violation of this section, s. 890 944.608, or s. 944.609 may be prosecuted for the act or omission 891 in the county in which the act or omission was committed, the 892 county of the last registered address of the career offender, 893 the county in which the conviction occurred for the offense or 894 offenses that meet the criteria for designating a person as a 895 career offender, or in the county in which he or she was 896 designated a career offender. 897 (14)(10)âPENALTIES FOR ASSISTING IN CAREER OFFENDER 898 NONCOMPLIANCE.âAny It is a misdemeanor of the first degree, 899 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083, for a person 900 who has reason to believe that a career offender is not 901 complying, or has not complied, with the requirements of this 902 section and who, with the intent to assist the career offender 903 in eluding a law enforcement agency that is seeking to find the 904 career offender to question the career offender about, or to 905 arrest the career offender for, his or her noncompliance with 906 the requirements of this section, to: 907 (a)âWithholds Withhold information from, or does not fail 908 to notify, the law enforcement agency about the career 909 offenderâs noncompliance with the requirements of this section 910 and, if known, the whereabouts of the career offender; 911 (b)âHarbors Harbor or attempts attempt to harbor, or 912 assists assist another person in harboring or attempting to 913 harbor, the career offender; 914 (c)âConceals Conceal or attempts attempt to conceal, or 915 assists assist another person in concealing or attempting to 916 conceal, the career offender; or 917 (d)âProvides Provide information to the law enforcement 918 agency regarding the career offender which the person knows to 919 be false information, 920 921 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 922 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 923 Section 3.âSection 944.608, Florida Statutes, is amended to 924 read: 925 944.608âNotification to Department of Law Enforcement of 926 information on career offenders.â 927 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 928 (a)ââCareer offenderâ means a person who is in the custody 929 or control of, or under the supervision of, the department or is 930 in the custody or control of, or under the supervision of, a 931 contractor-operated correctional facility, and who is designated 932 as a habitual violent felony offender, a violent career 933 criminal, or a three-time violent felony offender under s. 934 775.084 or as a prison releasee reoffender under s. 775.082(9). 935 (b)ââPermanent residence,â âtemporary residence,â and 936 âtransient residenceâ have the same meaning as provided in s. 937 775.261. 938 (c)ââProfessional licenseâ has the same meaning as provided 939 in s. 775.261. 940 (d) âVehicles ownedâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 941 775.261. 942 (2)âIf a career offender is not sentenced to a term of 943 imprisonment, the clerk of the court shall ensure that the 944 career offenderâs fingerprints are taken and forwarded to the 945 Department of Law Enforcement within 48 hours after the court 946 sentences the career offender. The fingerprints shall be clearly 947 marked âCareer Offender Registration.â 948 (3)âA career offender, as described in this section, who is 949 under the supervision of the department but is not incarcerated 950 must register with the department within 3 business days after 951 sentencing and provide information as required by this 952 subsection. 953 (a)âThe career offender shall provide his or her name; date 954 of birth; social security number; race; sex gender; date of 955 birth; height; weight; hair and eye color; tattoos or other 956 identifying marks; employment information required to be 957 provided pursuant to s. 775.261; and permanent or legal 958 residence and address of temporary residence within the state or 959 out of state while the career offender is under supervision in 960 this state, including any rural route address and a or post 961 office box; if no permanent or temporary address, any transient 962 residence within this state; and address, location or 963 description, and dates of any current or known future temporary 964 residence within this state or out of state; the make, model, 965 color, vehicle identification number (VIN), and license tag 966 number of all vehicles owned; and all home telephone numbers and 967 cellular telephone numbers required to be provided pursuant to 968 s. 775.261. The career offender shall also produce his or her 969 passport, if he or she has a passport, and, if he or she is an 970 alien, shall produce or provide information about documents 971 establishing his or her immigration status. The career offender 972 shall also provide information about any professional licenses 973 he or she has. The department shall verify the address of each 974 career offender in the manner described in s. 775.261. The 975 department shall report to the Department of Law Enforcement any 976 failure by a career offender to comply with any registration 977 requirements. 978 (b)âA career offender shall report in person to the 979 sheriffâs office within 48 hours after any change in vehicles 980 owned to report those vehicle information changes. 981 (4)âIn addition to notification and transmittal 982 requirements imposed by any other provision of law, the 983 department shall compile information on any career offender and 984 provide the information to the Department of Law Enforcement. 985 The information shall be made available electronically to the 986 Department of Law Enforcement as soon as this information is in 987 the departmentâs database and must be in a format that is 988 compatible with the requirements of the Florida Crime 989 Information Center. 990 (5)âThe information provided to the Department of Law 991 Enforcement must include: 992 (a)âThe information obtained from the career offender under 993 subsection (3); 994 (b)âThe career offenderâs most current address and place of 995 permanent, and temporary, or transient residence or residences 996 within the state or out of state, the address, location or 997 description, and dates of any known future temporary residence 998 within this state or out of state while the career offender is 999 under supervision in this state, including the name of the 1000 county or municipality in which the career offender permanently 1001 or temporarily resides and, if known, the intended place of 1002 permanent, or temporary, or transient residence or residences 1003 and the address, location or description, and dates of any 1004 current or known future temporary residence within this state or 1005 out of state upon satisfaction of all sanctions; 1006 (c)âThe legal status of the career offender and the 1007 scheduled termination date of that legal status; 1008 (d)âThe location of, and local telephone number for, any 1009 Department of Correctionsâ office that is responsible for 1010 supervising the career offender; and 1011 (e)âA digitized photograph of the career offender, which 1012 must have been taken within 60 days before the career offender 1013 is released from the custody of the department or a contractor 1014 operated correctional facility or within 60 days after the onset 1015 of the departmentâs supervision of any career offender who is on 1016 probation, community control, conditional release, parole, 1017 provisional release, or control release. If the career offender 1018 is in the custody or control of, or under the supervision of, a 1019 contractor-operated correctional facility, the facility shall 1020 take a digitized photograph of the career offender within the 1021 time period provided in this paragraph and shall provide the 1022 photograph to the department. 1023 (6)(a)âThe department shall notify the Department of Law 1024 Enforcement if the career offender escapes, absconds, or dies 1025 while in the custody or control of, or under the supervision of, 1026 the department. 1027 (b)âIf any information provided by the department changes 1028 during the time the career offender is under the departmentâs 1029 custody, control, or supervision, including any change in the 1030 career offenderâs name by reason of marriage or other legal 1031 process, the department shall, in a timely manner, update the 1032 information and provide it to the Department of Law Enforcement 1033 in the manner prescribed in subsection (4). 1034 (7)âIf the career offender is in the custody of a local 1035 jail, the custodian of the local jail shall notify the 1036 Department of Law Enforcement within 3 business days after 1037 intake of the offender for any reason and upon release, and 1038 shall forward the information to the Department of Law 1039 Enforcement. The custodian of the local jail shall also take a 1040 digitized photograph of the career offender while the career 1041 offender remains in custody and shall provide the digitized 1042 photograph to the Department of Law Enforcement. 1043 (8)âIf the career offender is under federal supervision, 1044 the federal agency responsible for supervising the career 1045 offender may forward to the Department of Law Enforcement any 1046 information regarding the career offender which is consistent 1047 with the information provided by the department under this 1048 section, and may indicate whether use of the information is 1049 restricted to law enforcement purposes only or may be used by 1050 the Department of Law Enforcement for purposes of public 1051 notification. 1052 (9)(7)âA career offender, as described in this section, who 1053 is under the supervision of the department but who is not 1054 incarcerated shall, in addition to the registration requirements 1055 provided in subsection (3), register and obtain a distinctive 1056 driver license or identification card in the manner provided in 1057 s. 775.261 s. 775.261(4)(c), unless the career offender is a 1058 sexual predator, in which case he or she shall register as 1059 required under s. 775.21, or is a sexual offender, in which case 1060 he or she shall register as required in s. 943.0435 or s. 1061 944.607. A career offender who fails to comply with the 1062 requirements of s. 775.261 s. 775.261(4) is subject to the 1063 penalties provided in s. 775.261(13) s. 775.261(8). 1064 (10)(a)(8)âThe failure of a career offender to submit to 1065 the taking of a digitized photograph, or to otherwise comply 1066 with the requirements of this section, is a felony of the third 1067 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 1068 775.084. 1069 (b)âA career offender who commits any act or omission in 1070 violation of this section may be prosecuted for the act or 1071 omission in the county in which the act or omission was 1072 committed, in the county of the last registered address of the 1073 career offender, in the county in which the conviction occurred 1074 for the offense or offenses that meet the criteria for 1075 designating a person as a career offender, in the county in 1076 which he or she was designated a career offender, in the county 1077 where the career offender was released from incarceration, or in 1078 the county of the intended address of the career offender as 1079 reported by the offender before his or her release from 1080 incarceration. 1081 (c)âAn arrest on charges of failure to register when the 1082 offender has been provided and advised of his or her statutory 1083 obligations to register under s. 775.261, the service of an 1084 information or a complaint for a violation of this section, or 1085 an arraignment on charges for a violation of this section 1086 constitutes actual notice of the duty to register. A career 1087 offenderâs failure to register immediately as required by this 1088 section following such arrest, service, or arraignment 1089 constitutes grounds for a subsequent charge of failure to 1090 register. A career offender charged with the crime of failure to 1091 register who asserts, or intends to assert, a lack of notice of 1092 the duty to register as a defense to a charge of failure to 1093 register shall register immediately as required by this section. 1094 A career offender who is charged with a subsequent failure to 1095 register may not assert the defense of a lack of notice of the 1096 duty to register. 1097 (d)âRegistration following such arrest, service, or 1098 arraignment is not a defense and does not relieve the career 1099 offender of criminal liability for the failure to register. 1100 (11)(9)âThe department, the Department of Highway Safety 1101 and Motor Vehicles, the Department of Law Enforcement, personnel 1102 of those departments, and any individual or entity acting at the 1103 request or upon the direction of those departments are immune 1104 from civil liability for damages for good faith compliance with 1105 this section, and shall be presumed to have acted in good faith 1106 in compiling, recording, reporting, or providing information. 1107 The presumption of good faith is not overcome if technical or 1108 clerical errors are made by the department, the Department of 1109 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, the Department of Law 1110 Enforcement, personnel of those departments, or any individual 1111 or entity acting at the request or upon the direction of those 1112 departments in compiling, recording, reporting, or providing 1113 information, or, if the information is incomplete or incorrect 1114 because the information has not been provided by a person or 1115 agency required to provide the information, or because the 1116 information was not reported or was falsely reported. 1117 (12)âAny person who has reason to believe that a career 1118 offender is not complying, or has not complied, with the 1119 requirements of this section and who, with the intent to assist 1120 the career offender in eluding a law enforcement agency that is 1121 seeking to find the career offender to question the career 1122 offender about, or to arrest the career offender for, his or her 1123 noncompliance with the requirements of this section: 1124 (a)âWithholds information from, or does not notify, the law 1125 enforcement agency about the career offenderâs noncompliance 1126 with the requirements of this section, and, if known, the 1127 whereabouts of the career offender; 1128 (b)âHarbors or attempts to harbor, or assists another 1129 person in harboring or attempting to harbor, the career 1130 offender; 1131 (c)âConceals or attempts to conceal, or assists another 1132 person in concealing or attempting to conceal, the career 1133 offender; or 1134 (d)âProvides information to the law enforcement agency 1135 regarding the career offender which the person knows to be false 1136 information, 1137 1138 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 1139 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. This subsection does not 1140 apply if the career offender is incarcerated in or is in the 1141 custody of a state correctional facility, a contractor-operated 1142 correctional facility, a local jail, or a federal correctional 1143 facility. 1144 (13)(a)âA career offender must report in person each year 1145 during the month of the career offenderâs birthday to the 1146 sheriffâs office in the county in which he or she maintains a 1147 permanent, temporary, or transient residence or is otherwise 1148 located to reregister. 1149 (b)âThe sheriffâs office may determine the appropriate 1150 times and days for reporting by the career offender, which must 1151 be consistent with the reporting requirements of this 1152 subsection. Reregistration must include any changes to the 1153 following information: 1154 1. Name; social security number; race; sex; date of birth; 1155 height; weight; hair and eye color; tattoos or other identifying 1156 marks; fingerprints; palm prints; photograph; employment 1157 information required to be provided pursuant to s. 775.261; 1158 address of permanent residence and address of any current 1159 temporary residence, within the state or out of state, including 1160 a rural route address and a post office box; if no permanent or 1161 temporary address, any transient residence within this state; 1162 address, location or description, and dates of any current or 1163 known future temporary residence within the state or out of 1164 state; the make, model, color, vehicle identification number 1165 (VIN), and license tag number of all vehicles owned; and all 1166 home telephone numbers and cellular telephone numbers required 1167 to be provided pursuant to s. 775.261. A post office box may not 1168 be provided in lieu of a physical residential address. The 1169 career offender shall also produce his or her passport, if he or 1170 she has a passport, and, if he or she is an alien, shall produce 1171 or provide information about documents establishing his or her 1172 immigration status. The career offender shall also provide 1173 information about any professional licenses he or she has. 1174 2.âIf the career offenderâs place of residence is a motor 1175 vehicle, trailer, mobile home, or manufactured home, as those 1176 terms are defined in chapter 320, the career offender shall also 1177 provide the vehicle identification number (VIN); the license tag 1178 number; the registration number; and a description, including 1179 color scheme, of the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, or 1180 manufactured home. If the career offenderâs place of residence 1181 is a vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat, as those terms 1182 are defined in chapter 327, the career offender shall also 1183 provide the hull identification number; the manufacturerâs 1184 serial number; the name of the vessel, live-aboard vessel, or 1185 houseboat; the registration number of the vessel, live-aboard 1186 vessel, or houseboat; and a description, including color scheme, 1187 of the vessel, live-aboard vessel, or houseboat. 1188 3.âAny career offender who fails to report in person as 1189 required at the sheriffâs office, who fails to respond to any 1190 address verification correspondence from the department within 3 1191 weeks after the date of the correspondence, or who knowingly 1192 provides false registration information by act or omission 1193 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 1194 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1195 (c)âThe sheriffâs office shall, within 2 working days, 1196 electronically submit and update all information provided by the 1197 career offender to the Department of Law Enforcement in a manner 1198 prescribed by the Department of Law Enforcement. 1199 Section 4.âSection 944.609, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1200 read: 1201 944.609âCareer offenders; notification upon release.â 1202 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 1203 (a)ââCareer offenderâ means a person who is in the custody 1204 or control of, or under the supervision of, the department or is 1205 in the custody or control of, or under the supervision of a 1206 contractor-operated correctional facility, who is designated as 1207 a habitual violent felony offender, a violent career criminal, 1208 or a three-time violent felony offender under s. 775.084 or as a 1209 prison releasee reoffender under s. 775.082(9). 1210 (b)ââPermanent residence,â âtemporary residence,â and 1211 âtransient residenceâ have the same meaning as provided in s. 1212 775.261. 1213 (c)ââProfessional licenseâ has the same meaning as provided 1214 in s. 775.261. 1215 (d)ââVehicles ownedâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 1216 775.261. 1217 (2)âThe Legislature finds that certain career offenders, by 1218 virtue of their histories of offenses, present a threat to the 1219 public and to communities. Career offenders have a reduced 1220 expectation of privacy because of the publicâs interest in 1221 public safety and in the effective operation of government. The 1222 Legislature finds that requiring these career offenders to 1223 register for the purpose of tracking the career offenders and 1224 providing for notifying the public and a community of the 1225 presence of a career offender are important aids to law 1226 enforcement agencies, the public, and communities if the career 1227 offender engages again in criminal conduct. Registration is 1228 intended to aid law enforcement agencies in timely apprehending 1229 a career offender. Registration is not a punishment, but merely 1230 a status. Notification to the public and communities of the 1231 presence of a career offender aids the public and communities in 1232 avoiding being victimized by the career offender. The 1233 Legislature intends to require the registration of career 1234 offenders and to authorize law enforcement agencies to notify 1235 the public and communities of the presence of a career offender. 1236 (3)(a)âThe department must provide information regarding 1237 any career offender who is being released after serving a period 1238 of incarceration for any offense, as follows: 1239 1.âThe department must provide the career offenderâs name, 1240 any change in the career offenderâs name by reason of marriage 1241 or other legal process, and any alias, if known; the 1242 correctional facility from which the career offender is 1243 released; the career offenderâs social security number, race, 1244 sex gender, date of birth, height, weight, and hair and eye 1245 color; tattoos or other identifying marks; address of any 1246 planned permanent residence or temporary residence, within this 1247 state or out of state, including a rural route address and a 1248 post office box; if no permanent or temporary address, any 1249 transient residence within this state; address, location or 1250 description, and dates of any current or known future temporary 1251 residence within this state or out of state; date and county of 1252 sentence and each crime for which the career offender was 1253 sentenced; a copy of the career offenderâs fingerprints, palm 1254 prints, and a digitized photograph taken within 60 days before 1255 release; the date of release of the career offender; employment 1256 information, if known, required to be provided pursuant to s. 1257 775.261; all home telephone numbers and cellular telephone 1258 numbers required to be provided pursuant to s. 775.261; 1259 information about any professional licenses the career offender 1260 has, if known; and passport information, if he or she has a 1261 passport, and, if he or she is an alien, information about the 1262 documents establishing his or her immigration status and the 1263 career offenderâs intended residence address, if known. The 1264 department shall notify the Department of Law Enforcement if the 1265 career offender escapes, absconds, or dies. If the career 1266 offender is in the custody of a contractor-operated correctional 1267 facility, the facility shall take the digitized photograph of 1268 the career offender within 60 days before the career offenderâs 1269 release and provide this photograph to the Department of 1270 Corrections and also place it in the career offenderâs file. If 1271 the career offender is in the custody of a local jail, the 1272 custodian of the local jail shall notify the Department of Law 1273 Enforcement within 3 business days after intake of the offender 1274 for any reason and upon of the career offenderâs release, and 1275 provide to the Department of Law Enforcement the information 1276 specified in this paragraph and any information specified in 1277 subparagraph 2. which the Department of Law Enforcement 1278 requests. 1279 2.âThe department may provide any other information deemed 1280 necessary, including criminal and corrections records and 1281 nonprivileged personnel and treatment records, when available. 1282 (b)âThe department must provide the information described 1283 in subparagraph (a)1. to: 1284 1.âThe sheriff of the county where the career offender was 1285 sentenced; 1286 2.âThe sheriff of the county and, if applicable, the police 1287 chief of the municipality, where the career offender plans to 1288 reside; 1289 3.âThe Department of Law Enforcement; 1290 4.âWhen requested, the victim of the offense, the victimâs 1291 parent or legal guardian if the victim is a minor, the lawful 1292 representative of the victim or of the victimâs parent or 1293 guardian if the victim is a minor, or the next of kin if the 1294 victim is a homicide victim; and 1295 5.âAny person who requests such information, 1296 1297 either within 6 months prior to the anticipated release of a 1298 career offender or as soon as possible if a career offender is 1299 released earlier than anticipated. All such information provided 1300 to the Department of Law Enforcement must be available 1301 electronically as soon as the information is in the agencyâs 1302 database and must be in a format that is compatible with the 1303 requirements of the Florida Crime Information Center. 1304 (c)âUpon request, the department must provide the 1305 information described in subparagraph (a)2. to: 1306 1.âThe sheriff of the county where the career offender was 1307 sentenced; and 1308 2.âThe sheriff of the county and, if applicable, the police 1309 chief of the municipality, where the career offender plans to 1310 reside, 1311 1312 either within 6 months prior to the anticipated release of a 1313 career offender or as soon as possible if a career offender is 1314 released earlier than anticipated. 1315 (d)âUpon receiving information regarding a career offender 1316 from the department, the Department of Law Enforcement, the 1317 sheriff, or the chief of police shall provide the information 1318 described in subparagraph (a)1. to any individual who requests 1319 such information and may release the information to the public 1320 in any manner deemed appropriate, unless the information is 1321 confidential or exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 1322 the State Constitution. 1323 (4)âThis section authorizes the department or any law 1324 enforcement agency to may notify the community and the public of 1325 a career offenderâs presence in the community. However, with 1326 respect to a career offender who has been found to be a sexual 1327 predator under s. 775.21, the Department of Law Enforcement or 1328 any other law enforcement agency must inform the community and 1329 the public of the sexual predatorâs career offenderâs presence 1330 in the community, as provided in s. 775.21. 1331 (5)âAn elected or appointed official, public employee, 1332 school administrator or employee, or agency, or any individual 1333 or entity acting at the request or upon the direction of any law 1334 enforcement agency, is immune from civil liability for damages 1335 resulting from the good faith compliance with the requirements 1336 of this section or the release of information under this 1337 section. 1338 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.